apertium-tg-fa/apertium-tg-en.tg.dix.xml
    <pardef n="/будан__vbser"> <!-- to be -->
    <!-- ҳастам ҳасти ҳаст аст ҳастем ҳастанд ҳастед -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳастам</l>
	  <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳасти</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e> <!-- this is is one acceptable form -->
        <p>
          <l>ҳаст</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p> <!-- this is the other acceptable form -->
          <l>аст</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳастем</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳастанд</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ҳастед</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

      
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>буд</l>
          <r>будан<s n="vbser"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="до/штан__vbhaver"> <!-- to have -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>рам</l> <!-- i have -->
	  <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ри</l> <!-- you have -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>рад</l> <!-- he has -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>рем</l> <!-- we have -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ранд</l> <!-- they have -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>ред</l> <!-- you have -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>штам</l> <!-- i had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>шти</l> <!-- you had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>шт</l> <!-- he had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
     <e>
       <p>
         <l>штем</l> <!-- we had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>

     <e>
       <p>
         <l>штанд</l> <!-- they had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>

     <e>
       <p>
         <l>штед</l> <!-- you had -->
	 <r>штан<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
       </p>
     </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ра/фтан__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вам</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ви</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вад</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вим</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>вид</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ванд</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фтам</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фти</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фт</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фтем</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фтед</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>фтанд</l>
	  <r>фтан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ш/удан__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авам</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ави</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авад</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авим</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>авид</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>аванд</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>удам</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уди</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уд</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>удим</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>удид</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>уданд</l>
	  <r>удан<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>

    </pardef>

  </pardefs>

    <e lm="доштан"><i>до</i><par n="до/штан__vbhaver"/></e>
    <e lm="будан"><i/><par n="/будан__vbser"/></e>
    <e lm="рафтан"><i>ра</i><par n="ра/фтан__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="шудан"><i>ш</i><par n="ш/удан__vblex"/></e>
